Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF830.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $2,200,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,200,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for a grant to Community Mediation Minnesota to administer a statewide housing mediation program to support renters and residential rental property owners. The program must: new text end new text begin (1) provide housing dispute resolution services to renters and rental property owners and homeowners; new text end new text begin (2) increase awareness of and access to housing dispute resolution services statewide; new text end new text begin (3) provide dispute resolution services, including but not limited to eviction prevention, mediation, and navigation services; new text end new text begin (4) partner with culturally specific dispute resolution programs to provide training and assistance with virtual and in-person mediation and resolution services; new text end new text begin (5) increase mediation services for seniors and renters with disabilities and illnesses who face housing instability; new text end new text begin (6) increase the diversity and cultural competency of the housing mediator roster; new text end new text begin (7) integrate housing mediation services with navigation and resource connection services, legal assistance, and court services programs; new text end new text begin (8) continue to develop and administer evaluation tools to design, modify, and replicate effective program outcomes; and new text end new text begin (9) provide for necessary administrative expenses. new text end